Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Cross references. —

For constitutional provision declaring it the duty of the legislature to protect and promote the health and morality of the people, see art. 7, § 20, Wyo. Const.

As to general powers of cities and towns, see §

15-1-103

.

As to planning in cities and towns, see §§

15-1-501

to

15-1-512

.

As to zoning for promotion of health, safety, morals and welfare in cities and towns, see §§

15-1-601

to

15-1-611

.

As to duties of city manager relative to public health, comfort and safety, see §

15-4-204

.

As to general powers of counties, see §

18-2-101

.

As to planning and zoning in order to promote public health, safety, morals and welfare in counties, see §§

18-5-101

to 18-5-107,

18-5-201

to

18-5-208

and

18-5-301

to

18-5-315

.

As to defense forces and affairs generally, see title 19.

As to labor and employment generally, see title 27.

As to mines generally, see title 30.

As to motor vehicles generally, see title 31.

For provisions concerning safety with respect to public utilities, see ch. 3 to title 37.

As to trade and commerce generally, see title 40.

As to welfare generally, see title 42.